test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nyeTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - не: # Noun 'woman / (fin) nainen' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - nye
     не+N+Sg+Nom: не
     не+N+Sg+Acc: немʼ
     не+N+Sg+Gen: неʼ
     не+N+Sg+Dat: ненʼ
     не+N+Sg+Loc: [нехэна, нехэня]
     не+N+Sg+Abl: нехэд
     не+N+Sg+Pros: [невна, невня]
     не+N+Du+Nom: нехэʼ
     не+N+Du+Acc: нехэʼ
     не+N+Du+Gen: нехэʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom: неˮ
     не+N+Pl+Acc: не
     не+N+Pl+Gen: неˮ
     не+N+Pl+Dat: нехэˮ
     не+N+Pl+Loc: [нехэˮна, нехэˮня]
     не+N+Pl+Abl: нехэт
     не+N+Pl+Pros: [неˮэмна, неˮэмня]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [нев, неми]
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [нев, неми]
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [нен, нени]
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [нехэн, нехэни]
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нехэнан, нехэнян, нехэнани, нехэняни]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нехэдан, нехэдани]
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [невнан, невнян, невнани, невняни]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [нехэюн, нехэюни]
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [нехэюн, нехэюни]
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [нехэюн, нехэюни]
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [нен, нени]
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [нен, нени]
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [неˮэн, неˮни]
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [нехэˮн, нехэˮни]
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нехэˮнан, нехэˮнян, нехэˮнани, нехэˮняни]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [нехэтан, нехэтани]
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [неˮэмнан, неˮэмнян, неˮэмнани, неˮэмняни]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нер
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: немд
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ненд
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нехэнд
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [нехэнанд, нехэнянд]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нехэданд
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [невнанд, невнянд]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: нехэюд
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: нехэюд
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: нехэют
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нед
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нед
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нет
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нехэт
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [нехэˮнат, нехэˮнят]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нехэтат
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: [неˮэмнат, неˮэмнят]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [неда, недя]
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [немда, немдя]
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [ненда, нендя]
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нехэнда
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [нехэнанда, нехэнянда]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нехэданда
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: [невнанда, невнянда]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: нехэюда
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: нехэюда
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: нехэюта
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [неда, недя]
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [неда, недя]
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [нета, нетя]
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нехэта
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [нехэˮната, нехэˮнята]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: нехэтата
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: [неˮэмната, неˮэмнята]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: немиʼ
#     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: неми
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: немиʼ
#     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: неми
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: нениʼ
#     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: нени
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: нехэниʼ
#     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: нехэни
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [нехэнаниʼ, нехэняниʼ]
#     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: [нехэнани, нехэняни]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: нехэданиʼ
#     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: нехэдани
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: [невнаниʼ, невняниʼ]
#     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: [невнани, невняни]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: нехэюниʼ
#     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: нехэюни
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: нехэюниʼ
#     не+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: нехэюни
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: нехэюниʼ
#     не+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: нехэюни
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: нениʼ
#     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: нени
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: нениʼ
#     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: нени
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: неˮниʼ
#     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: неˮни
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: нехэˮниʼ
#     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: нехэˮни
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [нехэˮнаниʼ, нехэˮняниʼ]
#     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: [нехэˮнани, нехэˮняни]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: нехэтаниʼ
#     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: нехэтани
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: [неˮэмнаниʼ, неˮэмняниʼ]
#     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: [неˮэмнани, неˮэмняни]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: нериʼ
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: немдиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: нендиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: нехэндиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [нехэнандиʼ, нехэняндиʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: нехэдандиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: [невнандиʼ, невняндиʼ]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: нехэютиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: нетиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: нехэтиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [нехэˮнатиʼ, нехэˮнятиʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: нехэтатиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: [неˮэмнатиʼ, неˮэмнятиʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: недиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: немдиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: нендиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: нехэндиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [нехэнандиʼ, нехэняндиʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: нехэдандиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: [невнандиʼ, невняндиʼ]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: нехэютиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: нетиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: нехэтиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [нехэˮнатиʼ, нехэˮнятиʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: нехэтатиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: [неˮэмнатиʼ, неˮэмнятиʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: неваˮ
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: неваˮ
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ненаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нехэнаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [нехэнанаˮ, нехэнянаˮ]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: нехэданаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: [невнанаˮ, невнянаˮ]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: нехэюнаˮ
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: нехэюнаˮ
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: нехэюнаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ненаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ненаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: неˮнаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нехэˮнаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [нехэˮнанаˮ, нехэˮнянаˮ]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: нехэтанаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: [неˮэмнанаˮ, неˮэмнянаˮ]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нераˮ
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: немдаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нендаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нехэндаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [нехэнандаˮ, нехэняндаˮ]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нехэдандаˮ
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: [невнандаˮ, невняндаˮ]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: нехэюдаˮ
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: нехэюдаˮ
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: нехэютаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: недаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: недаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нетаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нехэтаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [нехэˮнатаˮ, нехэˮнятаˮ]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: нехэтатаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: [неˮэмнатаˮ, неˮэмнятаˮ]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [недоʼ, недёʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [немдоʼ, немдёʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [нендоʼ, нендёʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нехэндоʼ
     не+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [нехэнандоʼ, нехэняндоʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нехэдандоʼ
     не+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [невнандоʼ, невняндоʼ]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: нехэюдоʼ
     не+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: нехэюдоʼ
     не+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: нехэютоʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [недоʼ, недёʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [недоʼ, недёʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [нетоʼ, нетёʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нехэтоʼ
     не+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [нехэˮнатоʼ, нехэˮнятоʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: нехэтатоʼ
     не+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [неˮэмнатоʼ, неˮэмнятоʼ]
     не+N+Pred+Abs: нед
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [недав, недув, недами, недми]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [недав, недув, недами, недми]
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [недан, недани, недни]
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: недар
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: недамд
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: неданд
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [недада, недда]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: недамда
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: неданда
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [недамиʼ, недмиʼ]
#     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [недами, недми]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [недамиʼ, недмиʼ]
#     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [недами, недми]
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [неданиʼ, недниʼ]
#     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [недани, недни]
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [недариʼ, недриʼ]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: недамдиʼ
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: недандиʼ
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [недадиʼ, неддиʼ]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: недамдиʼ
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: недандиʼ
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [недаваˮ, недваˮ]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [недаваˮ, недваˮ]
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [неданаˮ, неднаˮ]
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [недараˮ, недраˮ]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: недамдаˮ
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: недандаˮ
     не+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [недадоʼ, неддоʼ]
     не+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: недамдоʼ
     не+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: недандоʼ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: недмʼ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нен
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: не
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нениʼ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: недиʼ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэʼ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: неваˮ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: недаˮ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: неˮ
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: недамзь
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ненась
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: несь
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ненинзь
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нединзь
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэнзь
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: неваць
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: недаць
     не+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нець
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нев
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нер
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [неда, недя]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: немиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нериʼ
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: недиʼ
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: неваˮ
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нераˮ
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [недоʼ, недёʼ]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: невась
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нерась
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [недась, недясь]
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: неминзь
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: неринзь
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нединзь
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: неваць
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нераць
     не+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [недонзь, недёнзь]
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюн
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюд
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюда
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюниʼ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюдиʼ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюнаˮ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюдаˮ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нехэюдоʼ
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюнась
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдась
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдась
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюнинзь
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдинзь
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдинзь
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюнаць
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдаць
     не+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нехэюдонзь
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нен
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нед
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [неда, недя]
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нениʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: недиʼ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: недаˮ
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [недоʼ, недёʼ]
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненась
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: недась
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [недась, недясь]
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненинзь
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нединзь
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нединзь
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненаць
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: недаць
     не+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [недонзь, недёнзь]
     не+N+Tra: неӈэ
     не+N+Car: несиˮ
